Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-4907
Retaliation prohibited.

An officer shall not be discharged, disciplined, or threatened with discharge or discipline, or subject to revocation or suspension of a certificate under sections 81-1401 to 81-1414.19, in retaliation for exercising the rights of the officer enumerated in sections 29-4901 to 29-4908.

Laws 2026, LB965, § 28.
October 1, 2026